Louisiana, session 2026, HB1135.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:3808(A)(2)(b) and (P)(2)(b) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§3808. Terms and conditions of licenses and permits
A. A person who presents himself as, or advertises as, engaging in the
arborist profession shall be required to obtain a license which shall subject that
person to the following provisions:
* * *
(2) For license renewal, each arborist shall do the following:
* * *
(b) Show proof of current and sufficient general liability and workers'
compensation insurance, if applicable or provide documentation demonstrating that
they are exempt.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2581 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1135
P. Utility arborists shall be subject to the following provisions:
* * *
(2) For license renewal, each utility arborist shall do the following:
* * *
(b) Show proof of current and sufficient general liability and workers'
compensation insurance, if applicable or provide documentation demonstrating that
they are exempt.
* * *